Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 6
PARTNER'S DISSOCIATION

7-64-601. Events causing partner's dissociation.

A partner is dissociated from a partnership upon the occurrence of any of the following events:

The partnership's having notice of the partner's express will to withdraw as a partner; except that, if the partnership has notice that the partner's will is to withdraw at a later date, then the dissociation shall occur at the later date stated by the partner;

An event agreed to in the partnership agreement as causing the partner's dissociation;

The partner's expulsion pursuant to the partnership agreement;

The partner's expulsion by the unanimous vote of the other partners if:

It is unlawful to carry on the partnership business with that partner;

There has been a transfer of all or substantially all of that partner's transferable interest, other than a transfer for security purposes which has not been foreclosed, or a court order charging the partner's interest which has not been foreclosed;

Within ninety days after the partnership notifies a corporate partner that it will be expelled because it has been dissolved or its right to conduct business has been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation, there is no revocation of the dissolution or no reinstatement of its right to conduct business; or

A partnership, limited partnership, limited partnership association, or limited liability company that is a partner has been dissolved and its business is being wound up;

On application by the partnership or another partner, the partner's expulsion by judicial determination because:

The partner engaged in wrongful conduct that adversely and materially affected the partnership business;

The partner willfully or persistently committed a material breach of the partnership agreement or of a duty owed to the partnership or the other partners under section 7-64-404; or

The partner engaged in conduct relating to the partnership business which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in partnership with the partner;

The partner's:

Becoming a debtor in bankruptcy;

Executing an assignment for the benefit of creditors;

Seeking, consenting to, or acquiescing in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of that partner or of all or substantially all of that partner's property; or

Failing, within ninety days after the appointment, to have vacated or stayed the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the partner or of all or substantially all of the partner's property obtained without the partner's consent or acquiescence, or failing within ninety days after the expiration of a stay to have the appointment vacated;

In the case of a partner who is an individual:

The partner's death;

The appointment of a guardian or general conservator for the partner; or

A judicial determination that the partner has otherwise become incapable of performing the partner's duties under the partnership agreement;

In the case of a partner that is a trust or is acting as a partner by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, distribution of the trust's entire transferable interest in the partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor trustee;

In the case of a partner that is an estate or is acting as a partner by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate, distribution of the estate's entire transferable interest in the partnership, but not merely by reason of the substitution of a successor personal representative; or

Termination of a partner's existence.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 885, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) amended, p. 2253, § 156, effective July 1, 2004.

7-64-602. Partner's power to dissociate - wrongful dissociation.

A partner has the power to dissociate at any time, rightfully or wrongfully, by express will pursuant to section 7-64-601 (1)(a).

A partner's dissociation is wrongful only if:

It is in breach of an express provision of the partnership agreement; or

In the case of a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking, before the expiration of the term or the completion of the undertaking:

The partner withdraws by express will, unless the withdrawal follows within ninety days after another partner's dissociation by death or otherwise under section 7-64-601 (1)(f) to (1)(j) or wrongful dissociation under this subsection (2);

The partner is expelled by judicial determination under section 7-64-601 (1)(e);

The partner is dissociated under section 7-64-601 (1)(f); or

In the case of a partner who is not an individual, trust other than a business trust, or estate, the partner is expelled or otherwise dissociated because it willfully dissolved or terminated.

A partner who wrongfully dissociates is liable to the partnership and to the other partners for damages caused by the dissociation. The liability is in addition to any other obligation of the partner to the partnership or to the other partners.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 887, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

7-64-603. Effect of partner's dissociation.

If a partner's dissociation results in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business, part 8 of this article applies; otherwise, part 7 of this article applies.

Upon a partner's dissociation:

The partner's right to participate in the management and conduct of the partnership business terminates, except as otherwise provided in section 7-64-803;

The partner's duties under section 7-64-404 (1)(c) terminate; and

The partner's duties under section 7-64-404 (1)(a), (1)(b), and (2) continue only with regard to matters arising and events occurring before the partner's dissociation, unless the partner participates in winding up the partnership's business pursuant to section 7-64-803.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 887, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.